Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Chapter 14 Wyoming Veterans’ Skilled Nursing Facility

§ 25-14-101.
Purpose; admission of veterans and veterans’ spouses; admission of “gold star” nonveterans; preference to veterans and veterans’ spouses; capacity.

The Wyoming veterans’ skilled nursing facility is created to provide veterans with skilled nursing benefits across multiple levels of need. The skilled nursing facility shall provide community living, care and treatment for individuals who, due to wounds, disease, old age or other infirmities as determined by department of health rules, need safety net care because they cannot be served in private facilities, skilled nursing care or subsidized long-term care benefits and who are:

Honorably discharged veterans of the armed forces of the United States; or

Members of the state national guard disabled while on duty.

The department of health may admit to the Wyoming veterans’ skilled nursing facility a spouse of a person who qualifies under subsection (a) of this section, pursuant to rules or orders the department promulgates in accordance with W.S. 9-2-106(d) or

25-14-105

.

The department of health may admit persons to the Wyoming veterans’ skilled nursing facility for care and treatment who are not qualifying veterans or spouses of veterans under subsection (a) or (b) of this section if:

The persons are qualifying dependents or the parents of United States military personnel who died while in service or who died as a result of their service as provided by statute, rule or regulation of the United States department of veterans affairs; and

The persons are admitted pursuant to rules or orders promulgated in accordance with W.S. 9-2-106(d) or

25-14-105

.

Veterans and spouses of veterans who qualify for admission under subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be given preference of admission in all circumstances.

In addition to subsections (a) through (d) of this section, the veterans’ skilled nursing facility shall comply with United States department of veterans affairs rules regarding capacity guidelines, number of beds and populations served.

History.

2019 ch. 156, § 1, effective February 28, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 156 § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2019.

§ 25-14-102.
Veterans’ skilled nursing facility account; disposition, receipt and expenditure of monies received; acceptance of funding and donations.

There is created the veterans’ skilled nursing facility special revenue account. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-4-303(a), the department of health, veterans’ commission and state construction department shall deposit all monies and income received and collected by or for the Wyoming veterans’ skilled nursing facility into the account. Monies in this account are continuously appropriated to pay the costs of design and planning, construction, operation, loan repayment and maintenance of the veterans’ skilled nursing facility.

The department of health on behalf of the state may accept:

State, federal, local and nongovernmental funds for the purposes of this chapter provided that any condition on receipt of the funds is not inconsistent with this chapter;

Donations of land, money or other property for the construction, maintenance or other benefit of the veterans’ skilled nursing facility.

History.

2019 ch. 156, § 1, effective February 28, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 156 § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2019.

§ 25-14-103.
Services for residents; administration; facility operation.

The department of health shall, by contract or otherwise:

Provide skilled nursing care in the veterans’ skilled nursing facility in accordance with the federal Social Security Act and the federal Medicare and Medicaid regulations and United States department of veterans affairs requirements;

Appoint one (1) department of health employee to oversee federal and state requirements applicable to the veterans’ skilled nursing facility;

Provide other care as required under authority of the director of the department of health pursuant to W.S. 9-2-106(d).

The department of health may contract with an organization to provide day-to-day operation and administrative management of the veterans’ skilled nursing facility. The contract may provide for a monthly management fee as the department of health determines. The contract for operations and administrative management shall be in accordance with the best practices of a “green house” model community living concept and shall comply with state and federal law and regulations.

History.

2019 ch. 156, § 1, effective February 28, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 156 § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2019.

§ 25-14-104.
Payments for care.

Residents shall pay for services provided under this chapter according to department of health rules. Payments shall be set at amounts to ensure that appropriate services are provided at the veterans’ skilled nursing facility, as required by this chapter, and shall be consistent with requirements for grant in aid payments from the United States department of veterans affairs.

History.

2019 ch. 156, § 1, effective February 28, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 156 § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2019.

§ 25-14-105.
Promulgation of rules.

The department of health shall promulgate rules necessary to carry out this chapter. The rules shall provide admission requirements that do not jeopardize the veterans’ skilled nursing facility’s, or any veteran’s, qualifications to receive federal financial aid during admission to the veterans’ skilled nursing facility.

History.

2019 ch. 156, § 1, effective February 28, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 156 § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2019.